Hawaii statutes.
[§329D-15] Criminal offense; unauthorized
access to retail dispensing location. (a) No person shall intentionally
or knowingly enter or remain upon the premises of a medical marijuana retail
dispensing location unless the individual is:

(1) An
individual licensee or registered employee of the dispensary;

(2) A
qualifying patient or primary caregiver of a qualifying patient;

(3) A
government employee or official acting in the person's official capacity; or

(4) Previously
included on a current department-approved list provided to the department by
the licensee of those persons who are allowed into that dispensary's facilities
for a specific purpose for that dispensary, including but not limited to
construction, maintenance, repairs, legal counsel, or investors; provided that:

(A) The person has been individually approved
by the department to be included on the list;

(B) The person is at least twenty-one years
of age, as verified by a valid government issued identification card;

(C) The department has confirmed that the
person has no felony convictions;

(D) The person is escorted by an individual
licensee or registered employee of the dispensary at all times while in the
dispensary facility;

(E) The person is only permitted within those
portions of the dispensary facility as necessary to fulfill the person's
purpose for entering;

(F) The person is only permitted within the
dispensary facility during the times and for the duration necessary to fulfill
the person's purpose for entering;

(G) The dispensary shall keep an accurate
record of each person's first and last name, date and times upon entering and
exiting the dispensary facility, purpose for entering, and the identity of the
escort; and

(H) The approved list shall be effective for
one year from the date of the department approval.

(b) No individual licensee or registered
employee of a medical marijuana dispensary with control over or responsibility
for a retail dispensing location shall intentionally or knowingly allow another
to enter or remain upon the premises of the retail dispensing location, unless
the other is permitted to enter and remain as specified in subsection (a).

(c) Unauthorized access to a retail dispensing
location is a class C felony. [L 2015, c 241, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next